Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-529
Health claim form; hospital and ambulatory surgical facility; billing invoice; duty.

Each hospital and ambulatory surgical facility shall issue and complete a billing invoice on the uniform claim form for outpatient and inpatient services provided by the hospital or ambulatory surgical facility as a condition of reimbursement by medicaid, medicare, and issuers.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 57.